Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 27-117.2 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A political subdivision may not spend public funds to pay a
nonprofit organization that accepts and uses donations from the
public to deposit money with a court in the amount of a defendant’s
bail bond.
B. If a political subdivision engages in an activity prohibited
by subsection A of this section, a taxpayer or resident of the
political subdivision is entitled to appropriate injunctive relief
to prevent further activity prohibited by subsection A of this
section and further payment of public funds related to that
activity.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1705 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. A party that prevails in an action under subsection B of
this section is entitled to recover the party’s reasonable attorney
fees and court costs.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1705 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)